Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 4. Meeting of Electors

§ 2731.
Certificates of election.

When the canvassing board provided for in section 2592 of this title meets, it shall issue its certificates of election, with respect to the presidential election, to the electors nominated by the party whose candidate for president has received the greatest number of votes.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980.

§ 2732.
Meeting of electors.

The electors shall meet at the State House on the first Monday after the second Wednesday in December next following their election, to vote for President and Vice President of the United States, agreeably to the laws of the United States.
If there is a vacancy in the electoral college on that day, occasioned by death, refusal to act, neglect to attend, failure of a person elected to qualify, or for other cause, the other electors present shall at once fill such vacancy viva voce and by a plurality of votes.
When all the electors appear or a vacancy therein is filled, the electors shall perform the duties required of them by the Constitution and laws of the United States.
If a vacancy occurs and is filled as aforesaid, the electors shall attach to the certificate of their votes a statement showing how such a vacancy occurred and their action thereon.
The electors must vote for the candidates for President and Vice President who received the greatest number of votes at the general election.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980.